Hawaii statutes.
§96-5 Jurisdiction. The ombudsman has
jurisdiction to investigate the administrative acts of agencies and the
ombudsman may exercise the ombudsman's powers without regard to the finality of
any administrative act. [L 1967, c 306, §6; HRS §96-5; gen ch 1985]

Attorney General Opinions

Ombudsman has no jurisdiction over employee complaints
covered by collective bargaining agreements executed under chapter 89. Att.
Gen. Op. 73-6.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next